Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 2

Organization

45-3-201. Application to organize.

Any five (5) or more individuals, referred to as the incorporators, who are residents of this state, may form a capital stock or mutual savings and loan association subject to the commissioner's approval as hereinafter provided, by filing a written application for authority to organize with the commissioner in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. The application shall be signed by each of the incorporators and shall include:

Home Office. The name and the proposed location of the home office of the proposed association;

Incorporators. The name and address of each incorporator;

Capital. In the case of a capital stock association, the total amount of capital stock proposed and subscribed, if any has then been subscribed, and in the case of a mutual association, the total amount of subscribed deposit accounts, if any, together with the name and address of each subscriber; and

Other Information. Detailed financial and biographical information for each incorporator and subscriber that the commissioner may require, and economic data, projections of business volume, income, expense, and other information that the commissioner may require.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.15; T.C.A., § 45-1315.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

For transfer of functions under this chapter from the department of commerce and insurance to the department of financial institutions, see Executive Order No. 38 (February 11, 1983).

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 4.

45-3-202. Commissioner's approval of application for certificate of authority — Hearing.

Upon receipt of an application for authority to organize an association, including all supporting data, the commissioner shall promptly give written notice to at least one (1) of the incorporators of the proposed association designated to receive notices, and the incorporators shall cause the notice to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the home office of the proposed association is to be located. The notice shall state the name of the proposed association, where the incorporators propose to establish the home office of the association, and that the association shall have an opportunity to request a hearing on the application. If so requested, the hearing shall not be held within ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days after the publication of the notice. Any interested person may appear at the hearing in person or by agent or attorney, and orally or in writing show cause, upon any relevant ground, why the application should be approved or denied; provided, that any person objecting to the application shall reduce the substance of the objection to writing and file the same with the commissioner and give notice of the objection to the applicant at least five (5) days prior to the date of the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The commissioner shall not approve any application before affirmatively finding from all the information furnished with the application, the evidence produced at the hearing, and the commissioner's official records, that the prerequisites of this chapter have been complied with and that as to:

Management. The character, responsibility, and general fitness of the persons named in the application are such as to command confidence and warrant belief that the business of the proposed association will be honestly and efficiently conducted in accordance with the purposes of this chapter, and that the proposed association will have qualified full-time management;

Public Need. There is public need for the proposed association in the county stated in the application;

Capital Structure. The proposed capital structure meets the requirements of this chapter;

Undue Harm. The operation of the proposed association will not unduly harm any properly conducted federal or state association existing in the county or in a contiguous county in which the home office of the proposed association is to be located;

Name. The name of the proposed association is not the same as, or deceptively similar to, the name of any other association in the state, and this chapter has been complied with with respect to the use of a name by the proposed association; and

Insurance. A commitment for insurance of deposit accounts has been obtained by the proposed association that meets the requirements of this chapter.

If the commissioner so finds, the commissioner shall state approval and findings in writing and shall promptly mail one (1) copy of the proposed application and the attached findings to at least one (1) of the incorporators by registered or certified mail. In addition, the incorporators shall cause notice of approval to be promptly published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the home office of the proposed association is to be located.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.16; T.C.A., § 45-1316.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

45-3-203. Denial of application.

The commissioner, if unable to make the findings as required by the preceding section, shall endorse upon each copy of the application the word “denied” with the date of the endorsement and attach a written statement of the grounds for the denial.

One (1) copy of the proposed application and attached grounds of refusal shall be promptly mailed to at least one (1) of the incorporators by registered or certified mail.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.17; T.C.A., § 45-1317.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

45-3-204. Subscription to capital and interim organization.

If the commissioner approves the application for authority to organize, the incorporators shall perfect an interim organization by electing a chair, vice chair, and secretary, who shall act as the interim officers of the association until their successors are duly elected and qualified.

The interim officers shall have the following, and only the following, duties during the period after approval of the application by the commissioner and before issuance of a certificate of authority as provided in this chapter:

Subscriptions. They shall secure subscriptions for payments of the required amount of capital and, as the case may be, the required amount for paid-in surplus or for the expense fund, in the form and manner approved by the commissioner; and

Adoption of Charter and Bylaws. They shall call a meeting of subscribers, who shall adopt a charter and bylaws for the proposed association and elect directors to serve upon the issuance of the certificates of authority until the first annual meeting of the association and until their successors are elected and qualified.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.18; T.C.A., § 45-1318.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 4.

45-3-205. Requirements for charter and bylaws.

The proposed charter and bylaws of the association adopted at the meeting of subscribers shall contain those provisions required of charters and bylaws under the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27, as well as other information that the commissioner may, by regulation, prescribe, including, but not limited to, a statement in the charter that the association is organized under this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.19; T.C.A., § 45-1319; Acts 1994, ch. 551, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

The Tennessee General Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, ch. 1, has been repealed effective January 1, 1988. New provisions concerning business corporations may be found in title 48, chs. 11-27. New provisions concerning nonprofit corporations may be found in title 48, chs. 51-68.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 4.

45-3-206. Certificate of authority.

Filing of Required Information. After approval by the commissioner of the application for authority to organize, the proposed association shall:

File with the commissioner its charter and bylaws for approval; and

File with the commissioner a statement in a form and with supporting data and proof that the commissioner may require, showing that the entire capital including paid-in surplus or expense fund has been fully paid in lawful money unconditionally and that the funds representing the capital and, as the case may be, paid-in surplus or expense fund less sums spent with the approval of the commissioner for organization are on hand, and that it has acquired a commitment for the insurance of deposit accounts as provided in this chapter.

Issuance of Certificate of Authority. If the commissioner finds that the proposed association has in good faith complied with all the requirements of law, the commissioner shall approve the issuance of a certificate of authority and shall within thirty (30) days after the filing of the statement specified in this section, issue, in triplicate, a certificate of authority to transact a general savings and loan business. The commissioner shall then transmit a copy of the charter and the certificate of authority, together with all required supporting documents, to the secretary of state for filing as provided under the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27. Upon filing by the secretary of state, the existence of the association shall begin. Until that time, and except for the limited activities of incorporators and officers during the period of interim organization under this chapter, any proposed association shall not engage in any savings and loan business.

Opportunity to Answer Objections. If the commissioner does not approve the issuance of a certificate of authority, the commissioner shall state any objections in writing and give an opportunity to the proposed association to obviate the objections.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.20; T.C.A., § 45-1320; Acts 1994, ch. 551, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

The Tennessee General Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, ch. 1, has been repealed effective January 1, 1988. New provisions concerning business corporations may be found in title 48, chs. 11-27. New provisions concerning nonprofit corporations may be found in title 48, chs. 51-68.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 4.

45-3-207. Completion of organization.

Upon filing by the secretary of state, the directors elected during the period of interim organization shall proceed to:

Approve and adopt the charter and bylaws;

Elect officers pursuant to the bylaws;

Take action necessary to effect the insurance of the deposit accounts of the association; and

Take other action that may be necessary to complete the organization.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.21; T.C.A., § 45-1321.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 4.

45-3-208. Forfeiture of certificate of authority and charter for nonuse.

Any association that does not commence business within one (1) year after the date upon which its corporate existence begins, or, in the case of any association existing on July 1, 1978, within one (1) year after July 1, 1978, shall forfeit its corporate existence, unless the commissioner, before the expiration of the one-year period, approved in writing the extension of time within which it may commence business, upon a written application stating the reasons for the delay; provided, that the foregoing one-year provision shall not apply to existing associations that are engaged in litigation or that are in the process of having their insurance of accounts finalized.

Upon forfeiture, the certificate of authority and the charter shall expire, and all action taken in connection with the incorporation thereof except the payment of the incorporation fee shall then be void.

Amounts credited on deposit accounts, less expenditures authorized by law, shall be returned pro rata to the respective holders of the accounts.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.22; T.C.A., § 45-1322.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.

45-3-209. Corporate name — Exclusive use by associations.

The name of every association shall include the words “savings and loan association” and “savings bank.” These words shall be preceded or followed by an appropriate descriptive word or words approved by the commissioner. An ordinal number may not be used as a single descriptive word preceding the words “savings and loan association” unless the words are followed by the name of the town, city, or county in which the association has its home office.

No certificate of authority of a proposed association having the same name as any other financial institution authorized to do business in this state under this chapter or a name so nearly resembling it as to be calculated to deceive shall be issued by the commissioner, except to an association formed by the reincorporation, reorganization, merger, consolidation, or conversion of other associations, or upon the sale of the property or franchise of an association.

Except as otherwise provided by § 45-5-203, no person, either domestic or foreign, unless authorized to do business in this state under this chapter, shall do business under any name or title that indicates or reasonably implies that the business is of the character or kind of business carried on or transacted by an association or that is calculated to lead any person to believe that the business is that of an association.

Upon application by the commissioner or by any association, a court of competent jurisdiction may issue an injunction to restrain an entity violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of subsections (a)-(c).

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 1.23; T.C.A., § 45-1323; Acts 1985, ch. 330, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-101.